Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201279-1044
Forest reserve
funds; distribution to counties entitled for schools and roads; how made.

The forest reserve funds, annually paid into the state treasury
by the United States Government under an act of Congress approved June 30,
1906, shall be distributed among the counties of the state entitled to the
same for the benefit of the public schools and the public roads of such counties based upon information provided by the United States Department
of the Interior under the direction of the Commissioner of Education in the following manner:

(1) The State Treasurer shall annually on the first Monday in July certify
to the commissioner the amount of money received from the United States Government
as Nebraska's proportionate share of the income from the forest reserves within
the state for the most recent complete fiscal year; and

(2) The
commissioner shall, on or before August 5, make apportionment of such funds
to such counties according to the number of acres of forest reserve in each
county and certify the apportionment of each county to the county treasurer
of the proper county and to the Director of Administrative Services. The director
shall draw a warrant on the State Treasurer in favor of the various counties
for the amount specified by the commissioner.

Laws 1907, c. 143, § 1, p. 453;

R.S.1913, § 6938;

C.S.1922, § 6521;

C.S.1929, § 79-2010;

R.S.1943, § 79-2010;

Laws 1947, c. 284, § 1, p. 892;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 384, p. 820;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1309;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 690;

Laws 1999, LB 272, § 99;

Laws 2001, LB 797, § 33;

Laws 2011, LB333, § 11.